Utah statutes.
39-1-51.   Pay and benefits of National Guard members.

(1)  When called into the service of the state and not in the service of the United States, the members of the National Guard shall:

(a)  receive the same pay and allowance as members of the regular army or regular air force of like rank and length of service;

(b)  elect to:

(i)  receive medical, dental, disability, or death benefits equal to those received by full-time, permanent state employees; or

(ii)  maintain any medical, dental, disability, or death benefits already in place; and

(c)  receive one ration per day.

(2)  The state may not make payments to members of the National Guard for service for which the United States government makes payment.



Amended by Chapter 85, 2008 General Session

